Louisiana, session 2026, HB816.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:2717.1(F)(introductory paragraph) and (G) are hereby amended
and reenacted and Part I of Chapter 1-B of Title 9 of Code Title II of the Louisiana Revised
Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 9:2717.1.2 through 2717.1.8, is hereby enacted to read
as follows:
§2717.1. Prohibition of acquisition of immovable property by a foreign adversary or
a person connected with a foreign adversary
* * *
F. The Unless the person is an agent of a foreign adversary or a mandatary
of a foreign adversary, the provisions of this Section shall not apply to any of the
following:
* * *
Page 1 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 816 ENROLLED
G. For the purposes of this Section:
(1) "Agent of a foreign adversary" or "mandatary of a foreign adversary"
means a juridical person or a natural person that serves as a mandatary, as provided
in Louisiana Civil Code Article 2989, for a principal that is a foreign adversary and
meets one or more of the following criteria:
(a) Is under direction of a foreign adversary that has the power to direct or
cause the direction of the management or policies of the juridical person whether
through ownership of securities, by contract, or otherwise.
(b) Directly or indirectly has the right to vote fifty percent or more of the
voting interests of an entity that is owned or controlled by a foreign adversary or is
entitled to fifty percent or more of its profits and is, therefore, presumed to have the
power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of the juridical
person.
(c) Is a juridical person that meets any of the following:
(i) Is headquartered in a country identified as a foreign adversary.
(ii) Is held or controlled, either directly or indirectly, by a government of a
foreign adversary.
(iii) Is owned by, or the majority of stock or other ownership interest is held
or controlled by, any person who is a citizen of a foreign adversary, unless that
person is a legal permanent resident of the United States.
(d) Is a juridical person or a subsidiary that is owned by, or the majority of
stock or other ownership interest of which is held or controlled by, a corporation or
entity described in Subparagraph (c) of this Paragraph.
(e) Any individual person who is a citizen of a foreign adversary, unless that
person is a legal permanent resident of the United States and does not otherwise meet
any of the criteria provided in Subparagraphs (a) through (d) of this Paragraph.
(1)(2) "Foreign adversary" means an individual or a government identified
as a foreign adversary in 15 CFR 7.4(a) and identified in the database maintained by
the United States Department of the Treasury, Office of Foreign Assets Control.
Page 2 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 816 ENROLLED
(2)(3) "Person connected with a foreign adversary" means either of the
following:
(a) An agent of a foreign adversary or mandatary of a foreign adversary.
(b) the A juridical person, as defined in Civil Code Article 24, in which the
foreign adversary has the power to direct or cause the direction of the management
or policies of the juridical person whether through ownership of securities, by
contract, or otherwise. A person or entity that directly or indirectly has the right to
vote fifty percent or more of the voting interests of an entity or is entitled to fifty
percent or more of its profits is presumed to have the power to direct or cause the
direction of the management or policies of the juridical person.
* * *
PART I. PROHIBITED OWNERSHIP BY FOREIGN ADVERSARIES
§ 2717.1.2. Ownership of military-installation-adjacent lands by foreign adversaries
restricted
A. No foreign adversary or prohibited foreign actor shall directly or
indirectly own, acquire, lease, or otherwise obtain any interest in
military-installation-adjacent land.
B. A prohibited foreign actor may sell or convey an ownership interest in
military-installation-adjacent land in this state.
C. A person may conclusively rely upon an affidavit made by a person
intending to acquire or holding an interest in immovable property to the effect that
the person is not a foreign adversary or a prohibited foreign actor, and the
correctness of those facts may not be controverted against any person relying on the
affidavit, unless actual fraud by such person is proven. A person who gives a false
affidavit shall be responsible for any loss or damage suffered by any person whose
rights are adversely affected.
§ 2717.1.3. Definitions
For purposes of this Part, the following terms have the following meanings:
(1) "Controlling interest" means possession of the power to direct or cause
the direction of the management or policies of a company, whether through
Page 3 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 816 ENROLLED
ownership of securities, by contract or otherwise. A person or entity that directly or
indirectly has the right to vote fifty percent or more of the voting interests of an
entity or is entitled to fifty percent or more of its profits is presumed to possess a
controlling interest.
(2) "Foreign adversary" means a foreign nongovernmental person or foreign
government identified as a foreign adversary pursuant to 15 CFR 791.4 and
identified in the database maintained by the United States Department of the
Treasury, Office of Foreign Assets Control. This term does not include a person who
is a legal permanent resident with lawful presence in the United States.
(3) "Military installation" means any site that meets any of the following
descriptions:
(a) Active Air Force ballistic missile fields.
(b) Air Force bases administering active Air Force ballistic missile fields.
(c) Air Force bases and major annexes of those bases containing a unit from
the Air Force Air Combat Command.
(d) Air Force bases and major annexes of those bases containing an Air
Force research laboratory or test unit and associated sites.
(e) Air Force bases and major annexes of those bases, and Space Force bases
and major annexes of those bases containing a unit of the North American Aerospace
Defense Command and its regions.
(f) Air Force bases, Air Force stations, Space Force bases, Space Force
stations, and major annexes of those stations and bases that contain satellite,
telemetry, tracking, or commanding systems.
(g) Army bases, ammunition plants, centers of excellence, major depots and
arsenals, military terminals, research laboratories, and any related major annexes.
(h) Army combat training centers located in the continental United States.
(i) Headquarters of the Office of the Secretary of Defense, the Defense
Advanced Research Projects Agency, and major offices and any related annexes.
(j) Long range radar sites and major annexes of sites described in this
Paragraph.
Page 4 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 816 ENROLLED
(k) Major range and test facility base activities as defined in 10 U.S.C. 196.
(l) Marine Corps bases, air stations, and major annexes of these bases and
stations, excluding detachments and recruit depots.
(m) Military ranges as defined in 10 U.S.C. 101(f)(1) or joint forces training
centers.
(n) Naval bases and air stations including major support activities and
annexes.
(o) Naval surface, air, and undersea warfare centers and research laboratories
and major annexes of these centers and laboratories.
(p) Navy off-shore range complexes and off-shore operating areas.
(q) Any structure or enclosure that the presentation of a military
identification issued by the Department of Defense to active duty service members
is required to enter or access.
(4) "Military-installation-adjacent land" means immovable property within
twenty-five miles of a military installation.
(5) "Prohibited foreign actor" means any of following:
(a) An agent of a foreign adversary or mandatary of a foreign adversary.
(b) A corporation, limited liability company, pension or investment fund,
trust, or limited partnership where a foreign adversary or an agent or mandatary of
a foreign adversary has a controlling interest.
(6) "Agent of a foreign adversary" or "mandatary of a foreign adversary"
means a juridical person or a natural person that serves as a mandatary, as provided
in Louisiana Civil Code Article 2989, for a principal that is a foreign adversary and
meets one or more of the following criteria:
(a) Is under direction of a foreign adversary that has the power to direct or
cause the direction of the management or policies of the juridical person whether
through ownership of securities, by contract, or otherwise.
(b) Directly or indirectly has the right to vote fifty percent or more of the
voting interests of an entity that is owned or controlled by a foreign adversary or is
entitled to fifty percent or more of its profits and is, therefore, presumed to have the
Page 5 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 816 ENROLLED
power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of the juridical
person.
(c) Is a juridical person that meets any of the following:
(i) Is headquartered in a country identified as a foreign adversary.
(ii) Is held or controlled, either directly or indirectly, by a government of a
foreign adversary.
(iii) Is owned by, or the majority of stock or other ownership interest is held
or controlled by, any person who is a citizen of a foreign adversary, unless that
person is a legal permanent resident of the United States.
(d) Is a juridical person or a subsidiary that is owned by, or the majority of
stock or other ownership interest of which is held or controlled by, a corporation or
entity described in Subparagraph (c) of this Paragraph.
(e) Any individual person who is a citizen of a foreign adversary, unless that
person is a legal permanent resident of the United States and does not otherwise meet
any of the criteria provided in Subparagraphs (a) through (d) of this Paragraph.
§2717.1.4. Exceptions
The provisions of this Part do not apply to a person who might otherwise
qualify as a prohibited foreign actor owning military-installation-adjacent lands
under any of the following circumstances:
(1) The person is a natural person who is a United States citizen, regardless
of whether the United States citizenship was acquired by birth or the United States
citizenship was granted to a person after meeting the requirements established by the
United States Congress in the Immigration and Nationality Act, 8 U.S.C. 1101 et seq.
(2) The person is a natural person who is not a United States citizen but is
a permanent legal resident or is lawfully present in the United States by virtue of
authorization by the United States Department of Homeland Security.
(3) The person is a juridical person, as defined in Civil Code Article 24, that
is wholly owned by persons who qualify under Paragraphs (1) or (2) of this
Subsection.
Page 6 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 816 ENROLLED
(4) The military-installation-adjacent land is immovable property purchased,
leased, or otherwise acquired by a natural person that is used as a one-to-four family
residential property.
§2717.1.5. Civil penalties; actions
A.(1) A prohibited foreign actor that violates the provisions of this Part is
subject to a civil penalty of fifty thousand dollars and forfeiture if such entity does
not divest itself of military-installation-adjacent land that is acquired in violation of
this Part within one year after a judgment is entered in a civil action.
(2) Any civil penalty collected pursuant to this Section shall be paid to the
attorney general to offset costs associated with enforcement of provisions contained
in this Section.
B. A party to the contract to purchase, lease, or otherwise acquire immovable
property may rescind the contract prior to the transfer of the immovable property if
the party determines that a foreign adversary has an ownership interest that violates
the provisions of this Part.
C. The attorney general may bring an action for injunctive relief in the name
of the state against the foreign adversary or prohibited foreign actor to restrain and
enjoin the sale or lease prior to the transfer of the immovable property or to restrain
or enjoin the lease. The attorney general shall serve the petition for injunctive relief
upon the parties to the transaction. Upon receipt of the petition, a party may rescind
the contract to purchase, lease, or otherwise acquire immovable property pursuant
to Subsection B of this Section. The attorney general shall file a notice of lis
pendens in the mortgage records of the parish where the property is located no later
than three business days after instituting the proceeding. The institution of the action
and the filing of the notice of lis pendens shall have no effect on persons obtaining
rights in the immovable property prior to the filing of the notice of the pending
action.
D.(1) The attorney general may serve an investigative demand or subpoena
for deposition testimony to any person who is believed to have information,
documentary material, or physical evidence relevant to the alleged or suspected
Page 7 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 816 ENROLLED
attempt to enter into, conspiracy to enter into, or entering into a contract to purchase,
lease, or otherwise acquire immovable property in this state if all of the following
circumstances exist:
(a) The attorney general has evidence that a foreign adversary or a prohibited
foreign actor is attempting to enter into, conspiring to enter into, or has entered into
a contract to purchase, lease, or otherwise acquire immovable property in this state.
(b) The attorney general believes it to be in the public interest that an
investigation should be made to ascertain whether a foreign adversary or a prohibited
foreign actor in fact is attempting to enter into, conspiring to enter into, or has
entered into a contract to purchase, lease, or otherwise acquire immovable property
in this state.
(2)(a) Such investigative demand or subpoena for deposition testimony shall
contain a description of the attempt to enter into, conspiracy to enter into, or entering
into a contract to purchase, lease, or otherwise acquire immovable property in this
state under investigation and shall require such person to furnish, under oath or
otherwise, a report in writing setting forth the relevant facts and circumstances of
which the person has knowledge, or to produce relevant documentary material or
physical evidence for examination, at such reasonable time and place as may be
stated in the investigative demand that is the subject matter of the investigation.
Nonpublic personal information may be excluded from the report, deposition, or
other testimony.
(b) Any subpoena for deposition testimony issued pursuant to this Section
shall include a notice informing the prospective deponent of the deponent's right to
counsel at the deposition with an opportunity for cross examination, and the
deposition shall be conducted at the principal place of business, place of residence,
domicile, or, if agreeable to the deponent, at some other place convenient to the
attorney general and the deponent's attorney.
(c) Any deposition conducted pursuant to this Section shall be held at a
reasonable time as may be stated in the investigative subpoena. At any time before
the return date specified in the investigative demand or before the noticed deposition,
Page 8 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 816 ENROLLED
or within twenty days after the demand or deposition notice has been served,
whichever is shorter, a petition stating good cause for a protective order to extend the
return date or to modify or set aside the demand or deposition notice may be filed in
the district court that has civil jurisdiction in the parish where the person served with
the demand resides, is domiciled, or where his principal place of business is located.
(d) If no protective order from the court is secured and the written request
by the attorney general is not complied with by the return date of the written request,
the attorney general may apply to the court for an order compelling compliance with
the investigative demand or deposition notice.
(e) If any person fails or refuses to file any statement, report, documentary
material, or physical evidence or obey any investigative subpoena or demand issued
by the attorney general, except as permitted by a protective order issued by an
appropriate court, the attorney general may apply to the district court with civil
jurisdiction in the parish where the person served with the demand or subpoena
resides, is domiciled, or where his principal place of business is located for a rule to
show cause regarding why an order compelling compliance should not be issued.
(f) Any disobedience of an order compelling compliance pursuant to this
Section by a court shall be punished as a contempt of court.
E. Service of any demand, subpoena, or petition shall be made in the manner
provided by law.
F. Any immovable property acquired by a foreign adversary or a prohibited
foreign actor is subject to divestiture or civil forfeiture to the state.
G. The attorney general may use all other procedures and authority for
investigation, supervision, and conduct of actions on behalf of the state as provided
by law to enforce the provisions of this Part.
H. A court that the attorney general has petitioned may issue any additional
orders or render judgments against the foreign adversary or the prohibited foreign
actor as may be necessary to protect the public. Such orders shall include but not be
limited to any of the following:
Page 9 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 816 ENROLLED
(1) Revocation, forfeiture, or suspension of any license, charter, franchise,
certificate, or other evidence of authority of any person to do business in the state.
(2) Appointment of a receiver.
(3) Dissolution of domestic corporations or associations.
(4) Suspension or termination of the right of foreign corporations or
associations to do business in this state.
(5) Restitution to compensate any person who did not knowingly enter into
a transaction with the foreign adversary or a prohibited foreign actor for any loss,
expenses, court costs, or attorney fees which may have been incurred because of the
sale being void or enjoined.
(6) Civil forfeiture of any immovable property acquired by the foreign
adversary or the prohibited foreign actor in accordance with this Section.
I.(1) If, after examining the evidence, the attorney general concludes that a
violation of this Part has occurred, the attorney general may order the foreign
adversary or prohibited foreign actor to divest himself of all interests in the land
within ninety days after service of the order upon the foreign adversary or prohibited
foreign actor.
(2) The order of divestiture described in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection
shall be served personally or by certified mail.
J.(1) If the holder of the interest that is ordered to be divested disputes the
determination of the attorney general that a violation of this Part occurred, the holder
may submit a written request to the attorney general for a judicial determination.
(2) The written request described in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection shall
be delivered to the attorney general within sixty days after service of the order of
divestiture. If no written request is received within this time, the determination of
the attorney general shall become final.
(3) A foreign adversary, prohibited foreign actor, or any holder of interest
may seek judicial review after the final determination of the attorney general.
(4) Any appeal from the final determination of the attorney general shall be
in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
Page 10 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 816 ENROLLED
K.(1) If the foreign adversary or prohibited foreign actor fails to divest
himself of all interests pursuant to Paragraph (I)(1) of this Section or if a holder of
the interest submits a written request pursuant to Subsection J of this Section, the
attorney general may bring an action to divest the interest.
(2) The attorney general may initiate a civil action pursuant to this Section
in either the parish of East Baton Rouge or a parish where a portion of the
immovable property is located.
(3) The attorney general shall record in the public mortgage records of the
parish clerk of court of each parish where any portion of the immovable property is
located a notice of pendency of the action pursuant to Chapter 4 of Code Title II of
Book VII of the Code of Civil Procedure.
L. If the holder of the interest in immovable property has submitted a written
request pursuant to Subsection J of this Section, the court shall conduct an
evidentiary hearing to determine, by a preponderance of the evidence, if a violation
of this Part occurred prior to taking any other action. If the court determines that
there has been no violation, the court shall dismiss the action and expunge the notice
of pending action.
M.(1) If a court of competent jurisdiction determines that a violation of this
Part has occurred, the court shall order the sheriff in the parish where the immovable
property is located to sell the immovable property in the same manner as a judicial
sale in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3 of Code Title VII of Book III
of the Code of Civil Procedure.
(2) The court shall order that the price of the sale is no less than the sum of
all of the following:
(a) Ad valorem taxes and other liens payable to a political subdivision of the
state that are due or past due and attributable to the property.
(b) Indebtedness, including interests, penalties, attorney fees, court costs, and
other expenses, secured by a conventional mortgage on the property or any portion
of the property.
Page 11 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 816 ENROLLED
(c) Indebtedness, including interest, penalties, attorney fees, and court costs,
secured by a judicial or legal mortgage on the property.
(d) Indebtedness, including interest, penalties, attorney fees, and court costs,
secured by a lien or privilege on the property.
(e) Commissions due to a real estate broker or real estate agent.
(f) Costs related to the perfection of the sale.
(2) After satisfaction of all mortgages, liens, privileges, and other
encumbrances of the property and payment of all persons providing services in
connection with the transfer of the property, sheriff's fees, and credits to the
purchaser relating to tax and other customary prorations, the remaining proceeds of
the sale shall be considered a civil asset forfeiture and the money shall be paid to the
Department of Justice.
§2717.1.6. Protection of ownership interests
A. All forfeitures or dispositions under this Part shall be made with due
provisions for the rights of any person who did not knowingly enter into a transaction
with the foreign adversary or the prohibited foreign actor.
B. No mortgage, lien, privilege, or other security interest recognized under
the laws of this state and no ownership interest in indivision, lease, servitude,
usufruct, right of use, bond for deed, or other real right shall be affected by the
forfeiture, seizure, or divestiture provisions of this Part.
C. No forfeiture or disposition pursuant to this Part shall affect the rights of
any person who did not knowingly enter into a transaction with the foreign adversary
or a prohibited foreign actor.
D. The attorney general shall, within three business days of instituting any
action pursuant to this Part, file a copy of the petition or other pleading instituting
the action in the mortgage records of the parish where any related immovable
property is situated.
E. The attorney general shall provide notice of pending forfeiture, seizure,
or divestiture to the holder of each mortgage, lien, or security interest in the same
manner as provided in R.S. 14:90.1 or R.S. 40:2608.
Page 12 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 816 ENROLLED
F. The attorney general shall provide notice of pending forfeiture, seizure,
or divestiture to the holder of any interest in the immovable property being seized.
G. The attorney general may cause the cancellation of the petition or other
pleading from the mortgage records no later than three business days after judgment
is rendered or after a request for cancellation is made by any interested party seeking
to transfer the property to a person other than a foreign adversary or a prohibited
foreign actor. If the petition or other pleading relates to a property interest vested in
a foreign adversary or a prohibited foreign actor, the attorney general may petition
the court for an order requiring that the proceeds of the sale attributable to the
property interest of the foreign adversary or a prohibited foreign actor be deposited
in the registry of the court where the proceeding is pending after the deduction of
payments to mortgagees, lienholders, person providing services in connection with
the transfer of the property, and credits to the purchaser relating to tax and other
customary prorations.
§2717.1.7. Limitation of liability for failure to identify a foreign adversary or
prohibited foreign actor
No attorney, title insurer, title insurance producer, title insurance agency
producer, lender, mortgage servicer, notary public, real estate agent, real estate
broker, seller, or lessor, or any of their directors, officers, or employees, are required
to make any investigation as to whether a party to a transaction involving immovable
property is a foreign adversary or prohibited foreign actor, nor is any such person
liable for failing to identify that a party to a transaction involving immovable
property is a foreign adversary or prohibited foreign actor.
§2717.1.8. Applicability
Except as otherwise provided in this Part, the provisions contained in this
Part apply only to immovable property acquired by a foreign adversary or prohibited
foreign actor on or after August 1, 2026. If a foreign adversary or prohibited foreign
actor acquires immovable property despite the prohibitions contained in this Part, the
property shall be subject to forfeiture only during the period in which the foreign
adversary or prohibited foreign actor owns the property. Rights in immovable
Page 13 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 816 ENROLLED
property shall not be void or voidable because the property or right in that property
was previously held by a foreign adversary or prohibited foreign actor.
Section 2. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby directed, pursuant to its
statutory authority, to make the following technical changes:
(1) Renumber the definitions in R.S. 9:2717.1.2 in order to place the definitions in
alphabetical order.
(2) Change the Section numbers in Part I of Chapter 1-B of Title 9 of Code Title II
of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 9:2717.1.1 through 2717.1.7,
and renumber the Section numbers in Chapter 1-B of Title 9 of Code Title II of the
Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950 to be comprised of R.S. 9:2717.1.2 through 2717.1.8.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 14 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.